California statutes. Labor Code
(B) (i) For purposes of subparagraph (A), a public subsidy is de minimis if it is both less than six
 hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) and less than 2 percent of the total project cost.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), for purposes of subparagraph (A), a public subsidy for a project that consists entirely of single-family dwellings is de minimis if it is less than 2 percent of the total project cost.

(iii) This subparagraph shall not apply to a project that was advertised for bid, or a contract that was awarded, before July 1, 2021.

(4) The construction or rehabilitation of affordable housing units for low- or
 moderate-income persons pursuant to paragraph (5) or (7) of subdivision (e) of Section 33334.2 of the Health and Safety Code that are paid for solely with moneys from the Low and Moderate Income Housing Fund established pursuant to Section 33334.3 of the Health and Safety Code or that are paid for by a combination of private funds and funds available pursuant to Section 33334.2 or 33334.3 of the Health and Safety Code do not constitute a project that is paid for in whole or in part out of public funds.

(5) Unless otherwise required by a public funding program, the construction or rehabilitation of privately owned residential projects is not subject to this chapter if one or more of the following conditions are met:

(A) The project is a self-help housing project in which no fewer
 than 500 hours of construction work associated with the homes are to be performed by the home buyers.

(B) The project consists of rehabilitation or expansion work associated with a facility operated on a not-for-profit basis as temporary or transitional housing for homeless persons with a total project cost of less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(C) Assistance is provided to a household as either mortgage assistance, downpayment assistance, or for the rehabilitation of a single-family home.

(D) The project consists of new construction, expansion, or rehabilitation work associated with a facility developed by a nonprofit organization to be operated on a not-for-profit basis to provide emergency or
 transitional shelter and ancillary services and assistance to homeless adults and children. The nonprofit organization operating the project shall provide, at no profit, not less than 50 percent of the total project cost from nonpublic sources, excluding real property that is transferred or leased. Total project cost includes the value of donated labor, materials, and architectural and engineering services.

(E) The public participation in the project that would otherwise meet the criteria of subdivision (b) is public funding in the form of below-market interest rate loans for a project in which occupancy of at least 40 percent of the units is restricted for at least 20 years, by deed or regulatory agreement, to individuals or families earning no more than 80 percent of the area median income.

(d) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the following projects are not, solely by reason of this section, subject to this chapter:

(1) Qualified residential rental projects, as defined by Section 142(d) of the Internal Revenue Code, financed in whole or in part through the issuance of bonds that receive allocation of a portion of the state ceiling pursuant to Chapter 11.8 (commencing with Section 8869.80) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code on or before December 31, 2003.

(2) Single-family residential projects financed in whole or in part through the issuance of qualified mortgage revenue bonds or qualified veterans’ mortgage bonds, as defined by Section 143 of the Internal Revenue Code, or with mortgage credit certificates under
 a Qualified Mortgage Credit Certificate Program, as defined by Section 25 of the Internal Revenue Code, that receive allocation of a portion of the state ceiling pursuant to Chapter 11.8 (commencing with Section 8869.80) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code on or before December 31, 2003.

(3) Low-income housing projects that are allocated federal or state low-income housing tax credits pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 50199.4) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code, or Section 12206, 17058, or 23610.5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, on or before December 31, 2003.

(e) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work on the
 electric transmission system located in California constitutes a public works project for the purposes of this chapter.

(f) If a statute, other than this section, or a regulation, other than a regulation adopted pursuant to this section, or an ordinance or a contract applies this chapter to a project, the exclusions set forth in subdivision (d) do not apply to that project.

(g) For purposes of this section, references to the Internal Revenue Code mean the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and include the corresponding predecessor sections of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, as amended.

(h) The amendments made to this section by either Chapter 938 of the Statutes of 2001 or the act adding this subdivision shall not be
 construed to preempt local ordinances requiring the payment of prevailing wages on housing projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 346, Sec. 1.   (AB 2231)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.2.

For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of this chapter, “public works” also means any construction work done under private contract when all of the following conditions exist:

(a) The construction contract is between private persons.

(b) The property subject to the construction contract is privately owned, but upon completion of the construction work, more than 50 percent of the assignable square feet of the property is leased to the state or a political subdivision for its use.

(c) Either of the following conditions exist:

(1) The lease agreement between the lessor and the state or political subdivision, as lessee, was entered into prior to the construction contract.

(2) The construction work is performed according to plans, specifications, or criteria furnished by the state or political subdivision, and the lease agreement between the lessor and the state or political subdivision, as lessee, is entered into during, or upon completion of, the construction work.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 962.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.3.

(a) For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), with respect to contracts involving any state agency, including the California State University and the University of California, or any political subdivision of the state, “public works” also means both of the following:

(1) The hauling of refuse from a public works site to an outside disposal location.

(2) The on hauling of materials used for paving, grading, and fill onto a public works site, if the individual driver’s work is integrated into the flow process of construction.

(b) For purposes of this section, the “hauling of refuse” includes, but is not limited to, hauling soil, sand, gravel, rocks, concrete, asphalt, excavation materials, and construction debris. The “hauling of refuse” shall not include the hauling of recyclable metals such as copper, steel, and aluminum that have been separated from other materials at the jobsite prior to transportation and that are to be sold at fair market value to a bona fide purchaser.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 764, Sec. 2.   (AB 1851)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.4.

This chapter shall not apply to any of the following work:

(a) Any work performed by a volunteer. For purposes of this section, “volunteer” means an individual who performs work for civic, charitable, or humanitarian reasons for a public agency or corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as a tax-exempt organization, without promise, expectation, or receipt of any compensation for work performed.

(1) An individual shall be considered a volunteer only when their services are offered freely and without pressure and coercion, direct or implied, from an employer.

(2) An individual may receive reasonable meals, lodging, transportation, and incidental expenses or nominal nonmonetary awards without losing volunteer status if, in the entire context of the situation, those benefits and payments are not a substitute form of compensation for work performed.

(3) An individual shall not be considered a volunteer if the person is otherwise employed for compensation at any time (A) in the construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or maintenance work on the same project, or (B) by a contractor, other than a corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as a tax-exempt organization, that receives payment to perform construction, alteration, demolition, installation, repair, or maintenance work on the same project.

(b) Any work performed by a volunteer coordinator. For purposes of this section, “volunteer coordinator” means an individual paid by a corporation qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code as a tax-exempt organization, to oversee or supervise volunteers. An individual may be considered a volunteer coordinator even if the individual performs some nonsupervisory work on a project alongside the volunteers, so long as the individual’s primary responsibility on the project is to oversee or supervise the volunteers rather than to perform nonsupervisory work.

(c) Any work performed by the California Conservation Corps or by Community Conservation Corps certified by the California Conservation Corps pursuant to Section 14507.5 of the Public Resources Code.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2031, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 210, Sec. 1.   (AB 2463)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.6.

For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of this chapter, “public work” also means any construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work done under private contract when the following conditions exist:

(a) The work is performed in connection with the construction or maintenance of renewable energy generating capacity or energy efficiency improvements.

(b) The work is performed on the property of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(c) Either of the following
 conditions exists:

(1) More than 50 percent of the energy generated is purchased or will be purchased by the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(2) The energy efficiency improvements are primarily intended to reduce energy costs that would otherwise be incurred by the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 698, Sec. 1.   (SB 136)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.7.

For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of this chapter, “public works” also means any construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work done under private contract on a project for a general acute care hospital, except on a project for a rural general acute care hospital with a maximum of 76 beds, when the project is paid for, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of conduit revenue bonds, as
 defined in Section 5870 of the Government Code, issued on or after January 1, 2016, by a public agency. For purposes of this section, “general acute care hospital” and “rural general acute care hospital” have the same meaning as each term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 745, Sec. 1.   (AB 852)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.8.

For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of this chapter, “public works” also means any construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work done under private contract on a project for a charter school, when the project is paid for, in whole or in part, with the proceeds of conduit revenue bonds, as defined in Section 5870 of the Government Code, issued on or after January 1, 2021, by a public agency. For purposes of this section, “charter school” has the same meaning as the term is defined in Section 17173 of the Education Code, but does not include a
 charter school with an average daily attendance not exceeding 80 pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 355, Sec. 1.   (AB 2765)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1720.9.

(a) For the limited purposes of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770), “public works” also means the hauling and delivery of ready-mixed concrete to carry out a public works contract, with respect to contracts involving any state agency, including the California State University and the University of California, or any political subdivision of the state.

(b) For purposes of this section, “ready-mixed concrete” means concrete that is manufactured in a factory or a batching plant, according to a set recipe, and then delivered in a liquefied state by mixer truck for immediate incorporation into a project.

(c) For purposes of this section, the “hauling and
 delivery of ready-mixed concrete to carry out a public works contract” means the job duties for a ready mixer driver that are used by the director in determining wage rates pursuant to Section 1773, and includes receiving the concrete at the factory or batching plant and the return trip to the factory or batching plant.

(d) For purposes of this section, the applicable prevailing wage rate shall be the current prevailing wage, as determined by the director, for the geographic area in which the factory or batching plant is located.

(e) The entity hauling or delivering ready-mixed concrete to carry out a public works contract shall enter into a written subcontract agreement with the party that engaged the entity to supply the ready-mixed concrete. The written agreement shall require compliance with the requirements of this chapter. The entity hauling or delivering ready-mixed
 concrete shall be considered a subcontractor solely for the purposes of this chapter. Nothing in this section shall cause any entity to be treated as a contractor or subcontractor for any purpose other than the application of this chapter. 

(f) The entity hauling or delivering ready-mixed concrete to carry out a public works contract shall submit a certified copy of the payroll records required by subdivision (a) of Section 1776 to the party that engaged the entity and to the general contractor within five working days after the employee has been paid, accompanied by a written time record that shall be certified by each driver for the performance of job duties in subdivision (c).

(g) This section shall not apply to public works contracts that are advertised for bid or awarded prior to July 1, 2016.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 184.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1721.

“Political subdivision” includes any county, city, district, public housing authority, or public agency of the state, and assessment or improvement districts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.

“Awarding body” or “body awarding the contract” means department, board, authority, officer or agent awarding a contract for public work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1722.1.

For the purposes of this chapter, “contractor” and “subcontractor” include a contractor, subcontractor, licensee, officer, agent, or representative thereof, acting in that capacity, when working on public works pursuant to this article and Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 454, Sec. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

1723.

“Worker” includes laborer, worker, or mechanic.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 954, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------

1724.

“Locality in which public work is performed” means the county in which the public work is done in cases in which the contract is awarded by the State, and means the limits of the political subdivision on whose behalf the contract is awarded in other cases.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.5.

A contractor shall be registered pursuant to this section to be qualified to bid on, be listed in a bid proposal, subject to the requirements of Section 4104 of the Public Contract Code, or engage in the performance of any public work contract that is subject to the requirements of this chapter. For the purposes of this section, “contractor” includes a subcontractor as defined by Section 1722.1.

(a) To qualify for registration under this section, a contractor shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Register with the Department of Industrial Relations in the manner prescribed by the department and pay an initial nonrefundable application fee to qualify for registration under this section and an annual
 renewal fee on or before July 1 of each year thereafter. The director may establish and adjust annual registration and renewal fees of up to $800 by publishing the fees on the department’s internet website, and those actions shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). Any action taken to establish or adjust annual registration and renewal fees in excess of $800 shall be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and the director shall thereafter publish those fees to the department’s internet website. The initial registration and
 renewal fees may be adjusted no more than annually by the director to support the costs specified in Section 1771.3.

(B) A contractor may register or renew according to this subdivision in annual increments up to three years from the date of registration. Contractors who wish to do so will be required to prepay the applicable nonrefundable application or renewal fees to qualify for the number of years for which they wish to preregister.

(2) Provide evidence, disclosures, or releases as are necessary to establish all of the following:

(A) Workers’ compensation coverage that meets the requirements of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and includes sufficient coverage for any worker whom the contractor employs to perform work that is subject to prevailing wage requirements other than a contractor who is
 separately registered under this section. Coverage may be evidenced by a current and valid certificate of workers’ compensation insurance or certification of self-insurance required under Section 7125 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) If applicable, the contractor is licensed in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) The contractor does not have any delinquent liability to an employee or the state for any assessment of back wages or related damages, interest, fines, or penalties pursuant to any final judgment, order, or determination by a court or any federal, state, or local administrative agency, including a confirmed arbitration award. However, for purposes of this paragraph, the contractor shall not be disqualified for any judgment, order, or determination that is under appeal, provided that the contractor has
 secured the payment of any amount eventually found due through a bond or other appropriate means.

(D) The contractor is not currently debarred under Section 1777.1 or under any other federal or state law providing for the debarment of contractors from public works.

(E) The contractor has not bid on a public works contract, been listed in a bid proposal, or engaged in the performance of a contract for public works without being lawfully registered in accordance with this section, within the preceding 12 months or since the effective date of the requirements set forth in subdivision (e), whichever is earlier, and also has not been awarded a contract for, or engaged in the performance of, work on projects or developments
 without being lawfully registered in accordance with Section 1725.6, within the preceding 12 months. If a contractor is found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph, the period of disqualification shall be waived if both of the following are true:

(i) The contractor has not previously been found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph within the preceding 12 months.

(ii) The contractor pays an additional nonrefundable penalty registration fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b) Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(c) A contractor who fails to
 pay the renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on or before the expiration of any prior period of registration shall be prohibited from bidding on or engaging in the performance of any contract for public work until once again registered pursuant to this section. If the failure to pay the renewal fee was inadvertent, the contractor may renew its registration retroactively by paying an additional nonrefundable penalty renewal fee equal to the amount of the renewal fee within 90 days of the due date of the renewal fee.

(d) If, after a body awarding a contract accepts the contractor’s bid or awards the contract, the work covered by the bid or contract is determined to be a public work to which Section 1771 applies, either as the result of a determination by the director pursuant to Section 1773.5 or a court decision, the requirements of this section shall not apply, subject to the following requirements:

(1) The body that awarded the contract failed, in the bid specification or in the contract documents, to identify as a public work that portion of the work that the determination or decision subsequently classifies as a public work.

(2) Within 20 days following service of notice on the awarding body of a determination by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Section 1773.5 or a decision by a court that the contract was for public work as defined in this chapter, the contractor and any subcontractors are registered under this section or are replaced by a contractor or subcontractors who are registered under this section.

(3) The requirements of this section shall apply prospectively only to any subsequent bid, bid proposal, contract, or work performed after the awarding body is served with notice of the
 determination or decision referred to in paragraph (2).

(e) The requirements of this section shall apply to any bid proposal submitted on or after March 1, 2015, to any contract for public work, as defined in this chapter, executed on or after April 1, 2015, and to any work performed under a contract for public work on or after January 1, 2018, regardless of when the contract for public work was executed.

(f) This section does not apply to work performed on a public works project of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) or less when the project is for construction, alteration, demolition, installation, or repair work or to work performed on a public works project of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) or less when the project is for maintenance work.

(g) A contractor that has paid the registration or renewal fee and
 is registered under Section 1725.6 shall not pay the registration or renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to register as a contractor under this section.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 39, Sec. 24) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 52, Sec. 22.   (AB 171)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1725.6.

A contractor shall be registered pursuant to this section to be qualified to be awarded contracts for, or engage in the performance of, any work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any work on projects or developments where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to this section. For the purposes of this section, “contractor” includes
 a subcontractor as defined by Section 1722.1.

(a) To qualify for registration under this section, a contractor shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Register with the Department of Industrial Relations in the manner prescribed by the department and pay an initial nonrefundable application fee to qualify for registration under this section and an annual renewal fee on or before July 1 of each year thereafter. The director may establish and adjust annual registration and renewal fees of up to $800 by publishing the fees on the department’s internet website, and those actions shall not be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing
 with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).
 Any action taken to establish or adjust annual registration and renewal fees in excess of $800 shall be subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and the director shall thereafter publish those fees to the department’s internet website. The initial registration and renewal fees may be adjusted no more than annually by the director to support the costs specified in Section 1771.3.

(B) A contractor may register or renew according to this subdivision in annual increments up to three years from the date of registration. Contractors who wish to do so will be required to prepay the applicable nonrefundable registration or renewal fees to qualify for the number of years for which they wish to preregister.

(2) Provide evidence, disclosures,
 or releases as are necessary to establish all of the following:

(A) Workers’ compensation coverage that meets the requirements of Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) and includes sufficient coverage for any worker whom the contractor employs to perform work that is subject to prevailing wage and skilled and trained workforce requirements other than a contractor who is separately registered under this section. Coverage may be evidenced by a current and valid certificate of workers’ compensation insurance or certification of self-insurance required under Section 7125 of the Business and Professions Code.

(B) If applicable, the contractor is licensed in accordance with Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(C) The contractor does not have any delinquent liability to an
 employee or the state for any assessment of back wages or related damages, interest, fines, or penalties pursuant to any final judgment, order, or determination by a court or any federal, state, or local administrative agency, including a confirmed arbitration award. However, for purposes of this paragraph, the contractor shall not be disqualified for any judgment, order, or determination that is under appeal, provided that the contractor has secured the payment of any amount eventually found due through a bond or other appropriate means.

(D) The contractor is not currently debarred under Section 1777.1 or under any other federal or state law providing for the debarment of contractors from public works.

(E) The contractor has not been awarded contracts for, or engaged in the performance of, work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24,
 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code
 or where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to this section without being lawfully registered in accordance with this section, within the preceding 12 months, and also has not bid on a public works contract, been listed in a bid proposal, or engaged in the performance of a contract for public works without being lawfully registered in accordance with Section 1725.5, within the preceding 12 months. If a contractor is found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph, the period of disqualification shall be waived if both of the following are true:

(i) The contractor has not previously been found to be in violation of the requirements of this paragraph within the preceding 12 months.

(ii) The contractor pays an additional nonrefundable penalty registration fee of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(b) Fees received pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the State Public Works Enforcement Fund established by Section 1771.3 and shall be used only for the purposes specified in that section.

(c) A contractor who fails to pay the renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) on or before the expiration of any prior period of registration shall be prohibited from engaging in the performance of any work on projects or developments subject to the requirements of Section 65852.24, 65912.130, 65912.131, 65913.4, or 65913.16 of the Government Code or any work on projects or
 developments where a statute or regulation requires registration pursuant to this section until once again registered pursuant to this section. If the failure to pay the renewal fee was inadvertent, the contractor may renew its registration retroactively by paying an additional nonrefundable penalty renewal fee equal to the amount of the renewal fee within 90 days of the due date of the renewal fee.

(d) A contractor that has paid the registration or renewal fee and registered under Section 1725.5 shall not pay the registration or renewal fee required under paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) to register as a contractor under this section.

(e) Pending the issuance of new rules and regulations to implement this section, Sections 16410 to 16418, inclusive, of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations shall apply.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 39, Sec. 26) by Stats. 2024, Ch. 52, Sec. 24.   (AB 171)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1726.

(a) The body awarding the contract for public work shall take cognizance of violations of this chapter committed in the course of the execution of the contract, and shall promptly report any suspected violations to the Labor Commissioner.

(b) If the awarding body determines as a result of its own investigation that there has been a violation of this chapter and withholds contract payments, the procedures in Section 1771.6 shall be followed.

(c) A contractor may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to recover from an awarding body the difference between the wages actually paid to an employee and the wages that were required to be paid to an employee under this chapter, any penalties required to be paid under this chapter, and costs and attorney’s fees related to this action, if either of the following is true:

(1) The awarding body previously affirmatively represented to the contractor in writing, in the call for bids, or otherwise, that the work to be covered by the bid or contract was not a “public work,” as defined in this chapter.

(2) The awarding body received actual written notice from the Department of Industrial Relations that the work to be covered by the bid or contract is a “public work,” as defined in this chapter, and failed to disclose that information to the contractor before the bid opening or awarding of the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 804, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1727.

(a) Before making payments to the contractor of money due under a contract for public work, the awarding body shall withhold and retain therefrom all amounts required to satisfy any civil wage and penalty assessment issued by the Labor Commissioner under this chapter. The amounts required to satisfy a civil wage and penalty assessment shall not be disbursed by the awarding body until receipt of a final order that is no longer subject to judicial review.

(b) If the awarding body has not retained sufficient money under the contract to satisfy a civil wage and penalty assessment based on a subcontractor’s violations, the contractor shall, upon the request of the Labor Commissioner, withhold sufficient money due the subcontractor under the contract to satisfy the assessment and transfer the money to the awarding body. These amounts shall not be disbursed by the awarding body until receipt of a final order that is no longer subject to judicial review.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 954, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.   Operative July 1, 2001, by Sec. 21 of Ch. 954.)
-------------------------------------------

1728.

In cases of contracts with assessment or improvement districts where full payment is made in the form of a single warrant, or other evidence of full payment, after completion and acceptance of the work, the awarding body shall accept from the contractor in cash a sum equal to, and in lieu of, any amount required to be withheld, retained, or forfeited under the provisions of this section, and said awarding body shall then release the final warrant or payment in full.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1729.

It shall be lawful for any contractor to withhold from any subcontractor under him sufficient sums to cover any penalties withheld from him by the awarding body on account of the subcontractor’s failure to comply with the terms of this chapter, and if payment has already been made to the subcontractor the contractor may recover from him the amount of the penalty or forfeiture in a suit at law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

1730.

The Director of Industrial Relations shall post a list of every California code section and the language of those sections that relate to the prevailing rate of per diem wage requirements for workers employed on a public work project on the Internet Web site of the Department of Industrial Relations on or before June 1, 2013, and shall update that list each February 1 thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 280, Sec. 1.   (SB 1370)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1734.

Any court collecting any fines or penalties under the criminal provisions of this chapter or any of the labor laws pertaining to public works shall as soon as practicable after the receipt thereof deposit same with the county treasurer of the county in which such court is situated. Amounts so deposited shall be paid at least once a month by warrant of the county auditor drawn upon requisition of the judge or clerk of said court, to the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 523.)
-------------------------------------------

1735.

A contractor shall not discriminate in the employment of persons upon public works on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code. Every contractor for public works who violates this section is subject to all the penalties imposed for a violation of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 788, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1736.

During any investigation conducted under this part, the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement shall keep confidential the name of any employee who reports a violation of this chapter and any other information that may identify the employee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 302, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1740.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or any other law of this State, except limitations imposed by the Constitution, the legislative body of a political subdivision which has received or is to receive a loan or grant of funds from the Federal Government or a federal department or agency for public works of that political subdivision, may provide in its call for bids in connection with such public works that all bid specifications and contracts and other procedures in connection with bids or contracts shall be subject to modification to comply with revisions in federal minimum wage schedules without the necessity of republication or duplication of other formal statutory requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

1741.

(a) If the Labor Commissioner or his or her designee determines after an investigation that there has been a violation of this chapter, the Labor Commissioner shall with reasonable promptness issue a civil wage and penalty assessment to the contractor or subcontractor, or both. The assessment shall be in writing, shall describe the nature of the violation and the amount of wages, penalties, and forfeitures due, and shall include the basis for the assessment. The assessment shall be served not later than 18 months after the filing of a valid notice of completion in the office of the county recorder in each county in which the public work or some part thereof was performed, or not later than 18 months after
 acceptance of the public work, whichever occurs last.
 Service of the assessment shall be completed pursuant to Section 1013 of the Code of Civil Procedure by first-class and certified mail to the contractor, subcontractor, and awarding body. The assessment shall advise the contractor and subcontractor of the procedure for obtaining review of the assessment. The Labor Commissioner shall, to the extent practicable, ascertain the identity of any bonding company issuing a bond that secures the payment of wages covered by the assessment and any surety on a bond, and shall serve a copy of the assessment by certified mail to the bonding company or surety at the same time service is made to the contractor, subcontractor, and awarding body. However, no bonding company or surety shall be relieved of its responsibilities because it failed to receive notice from the Labor Commissioner.

(b) Interest shall accrue on all due and unpaid wages at the rate described in subdivision (b) of Section 3289 of the Civil Code. The interest shall accrue from the date that the wages were due and payable, as provided in Part 7 (commencing with Section 1720) of Division 2, until the wages are paid.
